California, session 20252026, SB778.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10236 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10236. (a) For the purpose of this chapter, a “migrant agricultural worker family” means a family with at least one individual who has earned at least 40 percent of their total gross income from employment in fishing, agriculture, or agriculturally related work during the 12-month period immediately preceding the date of application for childcare and development services.(b) Children of migrant agricultural worker families shall be enrolled in childcare and development programs on the basis of the following priorities:(1) The family moves from place to place.(2) The family has qualified under paragraph (1) within the past five years and is currently dependent for its income on agricultural employment, but is currently settled near agricultural areas.(3) The family resides in a rural agricultural area and is dependent upon seasonal agricultural work.(4) Eligibility and priority for services for the federally funded Migrant Child Development Program shall be in accordance with the applicable federal regulations.SEC. 2. Section 10236.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10236.5. For the purpose of enrollment in migrant child care and development programs, the department shall ensure that the self certification of income shall be consistent with other child care and development programs under this part.